Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article I, section 2, will read: new text end Sec. 2. No member of this state shall be disfranchised or deprived of any of the rights or privileges secured to any citizen thereof, unless by the law of the land or the judgment of his peers. There shall be neither slavery nor involuntary servitude in the state deleted text begin otherwise than as punishment for a crime of which the party has been convicteddeleted text end . Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to prohibit slavery or involuntary servitude as criminal punishment for a crime? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end